California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
The consultants shall render decisions on prior authorization requests in a timely manner. A timely manner shall be deemed to be an average of five working days after the prior authorization request is received by the department. A decision shall be an approval, denial, modification, or request for additional information. A supplemental authorization request submitted with additional information requested by a consultant shall be processed in a timely manner as if it were an original authorization request. If no decision on a prior authorization request is rendered by the consultant within 30 days of receipt by the department, the request shall be deemed to be approved. Final decisions of the department on all requests for prior
 authorization shall be reviewable under the department’s provider appeal and fair hearing procedures. If the request is denied, the department shall send notice to the provider and beneficiary of the right to appeal the decision.

In no event shall prior authorization be required when there is a bona fide emergency requiring immediate treatment.

In carrying out this section, notwithstanding Section 19130 of the Government Code, the department may contract, either directly or through the fiscal intermediary, for staff to accomplish the treatment authorization request reviews and medical case management, including appeals. The fiscal intermediary contract, including any contract amendment, system change pursuant to a change order, and project or systems development notice shall be exempt from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 11700) of Part 1 of
 Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and any policies, procedures, or regulations authorized by those laws.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 682) by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1161, Sec. 52.   Effective September 30, 2002.   Pursuant to Stats. 1985, Ch. 682, Sec. 2, this version (including the Ch. 682 amendment) is operative upon a determination by U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services that the changes will not result in denial of federal funding.)
-------------------------------------------

14103.7.

The department shall develop procedure codes for durable medical equipment and orthotic and prosthetic equipment and services, to enable the fiscal intermediary to efficiently and expeditiously process claims for the equipment or services.

For the purposes of this section, durable medical equipment, orthotics, and prosthetics shall include such equipment and accessories as the director may provide by regulation, as authorized by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1333, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14103.75.

Prior authorization may be required by the director for services or items prescribed or ordered by a practitioner who has been determined by the director to have been prescribing or ordering medically unnecessary or excessive services or items for Medi-Cal beneficiaries. When this requirement has been imposed upon a practitioner, the department shall give written notice to the practitioner, and shall also give written notice identifying the practitioner to all Medi-Cal providers who may be requested by that practitioner to furnish ordered or prescribed services or items. Payment may not be denied for services or items provided pursuant to an order or
 prescription issued by these practitioners prior to written notification by the department that these services or items must have prior authorization. After this notice has been received, it shall be the duty of the practitioner to seek prior authorization for all ordered or prescribed services or items within the scope of the director’s requirement. Where a practitioner fails to obtain prior authorization for a service or item within the scope of the director’s requirement and the service or item is provided or dispensed to a beneficiary by another provider, the prescribing practitioner shall be financially responsible for payment. The department shall not deny payment to the provider for the prescribing practitioner’s failure to obtain prior authorization, but shall reimburse the provider as otherwise provided by law and recover the payment from the prescribing practitioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1472, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14103.8.

(a) Medi-Cal services for beneficiaries who are eligible for services under the California Children’s Services Act (Article 5 (commencing with Section 123800) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code) as well as the Medi-Cal program shall be subject to prior authorization by the director.

(b) Claims for payment of prior authorized services shall be reviewed by postpayment audit conducted by the department, and shall not be subject to prepayment
 review under the California Children’s Services Act prior to submission to the Medi-Cal fiscal intermediary.

(c) The California Children’s Services program may require all applicants who are potentially eligible for cash grant public assistance to apply for Medi-Cal eligibility prior to becoming eligible for funded services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 473.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14104.

(a) The department may, to the extent feasible, and to the extent permitted or required by applicable provisions of federal law, enter into agreements with organizations of licensed professional persons known as Professional Standards Review Organizations, as the same are defined in, and authorized by, federal law, for the review of inpatient and other health services provided to beneficiaries in accordance with the provisions of this part, to determine whether such services may be approved for payment.

(b) Where such agreements are entered, the department may also enter into agreements for
 review of services provided to beneficiaries whose health care is funded solely from state or local sources without federal participation under Title XIX of the Social Security Act.

(c) Agreements entered into under this section shall be awarded on a nonbid basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 698.)
-------------------------------------------

14104.3.

(a) The department may, to the extent feasible, enter into nonexclusive contracts providing arrangements under which funds available for health care under this chapter shall be administered and disbursed to providers of health care or to their designated agents in consideration for services rendered and supplies furnished by them in accordance with the provisions of the applicable contract and any schedule of charges or formula for determining payments established pursuant to the contract. The contract shall provide that the
 contractor:

(1) Will take any action as may be necessary to assure that payment for services to hospitals and other facilities and professional services shall be based on standards determined by the director. The formula for the payments shall be determined in accordance with regulations establishing the methods to be used and the items to be included.

(2) Will take any action which may be necessary to assure that charges by providers will be reasonable and not higher than the charge for a comparable service and under comparable circumstances made to other payors.

(3) Bills for service under this chapter shall be reviewed and rejected or processed for payment within an average of 18 days from receipt of evidence establishing validity of the bill for payment in the office of the contractor. Ninety percent of all bills
 submitted to the contractor and under the contractor’s control, as set forth in the request for proposal, shall be processed and paid in 30 days and 99 percent of all claims submitted to the contractor and under the contractor’s control, as set forth in the request for proposal, shall be processed and paid in 90 days. If it is determined by the contractor that additional evidence of validity is required, the evidence shall be requested within 18 days from the date the bill is received by the contractor. In any event, notice shall be given within 30 days from the date the bill is received concerning the status of the bill submitted if the bill is held for peer review by the contractor beyond 18 days. In no event, shall the number of bills not processed for payment within 30 days of receipt exceed 9 percent of the total bills inventory.

(b) Contracts awarded under this section shall be awarded on a bid basis, and before entering into any
 contract, the director shall publish notice soliciting bids.

(c) Contracts awarded under this section may provide all of the following:

(1) Payments to the contractor may be on a capitation or prepayment basis, or on a combination of both methods of payment.

(2) Providers may assume all or part of the risk of utilization of services, or costs of services, or both, and that providers who agree to assume that risk may be separately classified for purposes of applicable rates of payment or administrative requirements.

(3) Any other provisions which have previously been incorporated into pilot programs established pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) and determined by the director to be desirable and feasible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 250.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14104.35.

(a) Any contract amendments, modifications, or change orders to a fiscal intermediary contract entered into by the department for the purposes of implementing Section 14104.3 shall be exempt, except as provided in subdivision (b), from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and any policies, procedures, or regulations authorized by that part.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not exempt the department from establishing a competitive bid process for awarding new contracts pursuant to Section 14104.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 49.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

14104.36.

(a) The following definitions apply for purposes of this section:

(1) “Identified provider” means either a fee-for-service Medi-Cal provider or any other provider participating in a program administered by the department, in good standing, identified by the department for an identified service period.

(2) “Identified service period” means the service dates involving a Medi-Cal Checkwrite contingency as identified by the department.

(3) “Medi-Cal Checkwrite contingency” means any situation involving a delay, nonfunctionality, or system error in the Medi-Cal Checkwrite Schedule provider claims processing system as
 identified by the department.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, if there is a Medi-Cal Checkwrite contingency, the department may make a contingency payment to an identified provider during an identified service period to ensure continued access to health care services, subject to approval of the Department of Finance.

(2) The department shall calculate a contingency payment based upon the previous payment claims history of the identified provider as identified in departmental records.

(c) The department shall reconcile the contingency payment for an identified provider against the actual claims for service dates during the identified service period. The department shall subsequently make payment adjustments to the identified provider in accordance with the departmental standards for
 provider claims processing.

(d) Any provider grievance or complaint arising from either a contingency payment or the reconciliation of a contingency payment shall be governed by Section 14104.5.

(e) This section does not alter the amount of reimbursement due to an identified provider for eligible claims or otherwise change any billing requirement or condition of program participation for a provider subject to this section.

(f) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section by provider manual, provider bulletins or notices, policy letters, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(g) The department shall seek any
 necessary approvals from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to implement this section. The department shall implement this section only in a manner that is consistent with federal Medicaid law and regulations, and only to the extent that the necessary approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is not jeopardized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 38, Sec. 47.   (SB 78)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14104.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director shall by regulation adopt such procedures as are necessary for the review of a grievance or complaint concerning the processing or payment of money alleged by a provider of services to be payable by reason of any of the provisions of this chapter. After complying with these procedures, if the provider is not satisfied with the director's decision on his or her
 claim, he or she may not later than one year after receiving notice of the decision, file a petition for writ of mandate pursuant to Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure in the superior court. This section shall be the exclusive remedy available to the provider of services for moneys alleged to be payable by reason of this chapter.

This section shall not apply to those grievances or complaints arising from the findings of an audit or examination made by or on behalf of the director pursuant to Sections 10722 and 14170. Article 5.3 (commencing with Section 14170) shall govern the grievances or complaints.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 255, Sec. 2.   (AB 839)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

14104.6.

No Medi-Cal fiscal intermediary contract shall be approved, renewed or continued if a state employee is employed in a management, consultant or technical position by the contractor or a subcontractor to the contractor within one year after the state employee terminated state employment.

For purposes of this section, “state employee” means any appointive or civil service employee of the Governor’s office, the Health and Welfare Agency, the State Department of Health Services, the Controller’s office, the Attorney
 General, or the Legislature who, within two years prior to leaving state employment, had responsibilities related to development, negotiation, contract management, supervision, technical assistance or audit of a Medi-Cal fiscal intermediary.

The requirements of this section shall not apply to any state employee who terminated state employment prior to the operative date of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 244.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14104.7.

The Director of the Department of Health Services shall negotiate a modification of the contract with Computer Sciences Corporation for the provision of fiscal intermediary services for the Medi-Cal program in effect on the effective date of this section to establish providers of durable medical equipment, prosthetic and orthotic devices, and emergency and nonemergency medical transportation as a distinct and separate provider classification for claim processing purposes. The director shall determine which providers qualify as providers for the purposes of this section. The contract shall be further amended to provide that claims of this type shall be
 processed for payment within an average of 25 days from the date of receipt. If the contractor fails to process such claims within the 25-day standard, the department shall assess maximum liquidated damages against the contractor, per day, until the performance standard is met.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 91, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14104.8.

(a) The Secretary of the Health and Welfare Agency shall be responsible for oversight of the contract for fiscal intermediary services awarded by the State Department of Health Services to Computer Sciences Corporation. The director of the department shall confer with the secretary of the agency regarding the progress made in implementing the contract.

(b) Within four months of enactment of this section, the State Director of Health Services shall contract for an 18-month period with a qualified systems engineering firm that has the ability to work at the software level
 to acquire the system produced by Computer Sciences Corporation for the purposes of monitoring the contract awarded by the department to Computer Sciences Corporation and ascertaining if the system meets contract requirements.

(c) The systems engineering firm shall monitor compliance with all provisions contained within the above-mentioned contract between the department and Computer Sciences Corporation.

(d) The contract shall:

(1) Require the firm to conduct an evaluation of Computer Sciences Corporation contract compliance, including design or operational deficiencies, and, within four months of the award of the monitoring contract, to report on this evaluation to the Secretary of the Health and Welfare Agency and the State Director of Health Services, who shall forward this report to the Legislature.

(2) Include provisions to permit the firm to develop specific remedies for design and operation deficiencies in the state owned Medi-Cal fiscal intermediary system.

(3) Require the firm to develop, install and operate the type of monitoring and control system required by the contract.

(4) Require production by the firm within one year of a detailed work plan and budget for managing the contract with Computer Sciences Corporation, including job descriptions, staffing levels and organizational controls in order to continue operation of the monitoring and control system at a high level of efficiency and expertise.

(5) Preclude the firm from bidding (or from being a major subcontractor to a prime bidder) on any subsequent contract for fiscal intermediary
 services for a period of five years from the date of the contract.

(e) If all requested documentation records and deliverables required in the contract between the department and Computer Sciences Corporation are not made available, as specified in that contract, to the designated systems engineering firm, the Secretary of the Health and Welfare Agency, the State Department of Health Services or the Joint Legislative Audit Committee, whichever has so requested, all applicable penalties and fines available under the contract shall be evoked by the State Department of Health Services.

(f) Subject to the approval of the Secretary of Health and Welfare, the State Director of Health Services shall have the authority to enter into a subsequent fiscal intermediary monitoring contract to be in effect upon the expiration of the one-year contract called for in subdivision (b) and to be
 based upon findings and recommendations produced under subdivision (d).

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1039, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14104.9.

Any Medi-Cal contract for fiscal intermediary services entered into on or after January 1, 1992, shall permit the submission of all paper claims for hospital services using billing forms that are as similar as possible to the UB-82, also known as the HCFA-1450. These billing forms shall be designed to be both optically scanned and automatically microfilmed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14104.93.

(a) The department may distribute provider bulletins and other provider communications for the Medi-Cal program by either print or electronic medium, including posting on the department’s Medi-Cal program Web site. The posting may include information relating to the California Children’s Services (CCS) Program, the Genetically Handicapped Persons Program (GHPP), the Family PACT program, and the Every Woman Counts program. Communications on the department’s Internet Web site shall be posted in a timely manner and maintained on the Web site
 for one year from the date of posting.

(b) The department’s Web site for the Medi-Cal program shall be appropriately maintained to ensure factual clarity regarding the program, to facilitate ease of use for providers, and to sustain the integrity of the Medi-Cal program.

(c) This section shall be implemented on the first day of the month following 30 days after the operative date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 758, Sec. 43.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.

(a) The director shall prescribe the policies to be followed in the administration of this chapter, may limit the rates of payment for health care services, and shall adopt any rules and regulations as are necessary for carrying out, but are not inconsistent with, the provisions thereof.

The policies and regulations shall include rates for payment for services not rendered under a contract pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200). In order to implement expeditiously the budgeting
 decisions of the Legislature, the director shall, to the extent permitted by federal law, adopt regulations setting rates that reflect these budgeting decisions within one month after the enactment of the Budget Act and of any other appropriation that changes the level of funding for Medi-Cal services. The proposed regulations shall be submitted to the Department of Finance no later than five days prior to the date of adoption. With the written approval of the Department of Finance, the director shall adopt the regulations as emergency regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code). For purposes of that act, the adoption of these regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety or general welfare.

(b) (1) Insofar as practical,
 consistent with the efficient and economical administration of this part, the department shall afford recipients of public assistance a choice of managed care arrangements under which they shall receive health care benefits and a choice of primary care providers under each managed care arrangement.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, Medi-Cal beneficiaries shall be entitled to affirmatively select, or to be assigned by default to, any primary care provider as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 14088.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when a Medi-Cal beneficiary is assigned, from any source, to a primary care physician, as defined in Section 14254, and that primary care physician is an employee of a primary care provider, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 14088, the assignment shall constitute an assignment to
 the primary care provider.

(c) If, in the judgment of the director, the actions taken by the director under subdivision (c) of Section 14120 will not be sufficient to operate the Medi-Cal program within the limits of appropriated funds, he or she may limit the scope and kinds of health care services, except for minimum coverage as defined in Section 14056, available to persons who are not eligible under Section 14005.1. When and if necessary, that action shall be taken by the director in ways consistent with the requirements of the federal Social Security Act.

(d) The director shall adopt regulations implementing regulatory changes required to initially implement, and annually update, the United States Health Care Financing Administration’s common procedure coding system as emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3
 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For the purposes of the Administrative Procedure Act, the adoption of the regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. These regulations shall become effective immediately upon filing with the Secretary of State.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, prospective reimbursement for any services provided to a Medi-Cal beneficiary in a nursing facility that is a distinct part of an acute care hospital shall not exceed the audited costs of the facility providing the services.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, reimbursement for anesthesiology, surgical services, and the professional component of radiology procedures except for comprehensive perinatal and obstetrical services shall be reduced by 9.5 percent of the amount of
 reimbursement provided for any of those services prior to the operative date of this subdivision. The director may exclude emergency surgical services performed in the emergency department of a general acute care hospital. To be excluded, emergency surgical services must be performed by an emergency room physician or a physician on the emergency department’s on-call list.

(g) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this subdivision to enable the department to obtain Medicare cost reports for the purpose of evaluating its Medi-Cal reimbursement rate methodology for nursing facilities.

(2) Skilled nursing facilities licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code shall submit copies of all Medicare cost reports to the department by October 1, 1995, for reporting periods that ended between
 July 1, 1993, and June 30, 1995.

On or after July 1, 1995, those facilities shall submit the copies to the department on the date that the Medicare cost reports are submitted to the Medicare fiscal intermediary.

(3) Hospitals providing skilled nursing care licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code shall submit a copy of all Medicare cost reports for reporting periods ended:

(A) January 1, 1993, through June 30, 1995, to the department by October 1, 1995.

(B) On or after July 1, 1995, to the department when the Medicare cost reports are submitted to the Medicare fiscal intermediary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 756, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.05.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 14105, and any other provision of law, the director may, without taking regulatory action pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, take one or both of the following actions:

(1) Establish the reimbursement rates necessitated by the establishment of updated coding systems required for compliance by the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA).

(2) Adopt and annually update the federal Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System codes (formerly known as the United States Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System HCPCS) or any other coding system required for compliance with this chapter, federal medicaid requirements, or the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA).

(b) The director may take the actions described in subdivision (a) by means of publication in the California Regulatory Notice Register, the Medi-Cal Provider Manual, or similar publications.

(c) The publication of reimbursement rates or coding systems pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include an effective date for the published rates or coding systems.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect
 the department’s compliance with federal medicaid law or regulations relating to the adoption of Medi-Cal reimbursement rates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 601, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.06.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 14105 and any other provision of law, the Medi-Cal reimbursement rates in effect on August 1, 2003, shall remain in effect through July 31, 2005, for the following providers:

(1) Freestanding nursing facilities licensed as either of the following:

(A) An intermediate care facility pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) An intermediate care facility for the developmentally disabled pursuant to subdivision (e), (g), or (h) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) A skilled nursing facility that is a distinct part of a general acute care hospital. For purposes of this paragraph, “distinct part” shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 72041 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) A subacute care program, as described in Section 14132.25 or subacute care unit, as described in Sections 51215.5 and 51215.8 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(4) An adult day health care center.

(b) (1) The director may adopt regulations as are necessary to
 implement subdivision (a). These regulations shall be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For purposes of this section, the adoption of regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety or general welfare.

(2) As an alternative to paragraph (1), and Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the director may implement this article by means of a provider bulletin, or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(c) The director shall implement subdivision (a) in a manner that is consistent with federal medicaid law and regulations. The director shall seek any
 necessary federal approvals for the implementation of this section. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal approval is obtained.

(d) The provisions of subdivision (a) shall apply to a skilled nursing facility, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, only until the first day of the month following federal approval to implement both the skilled nursing quality assurance fee imposed by Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 1324.20) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code and the rate methodology developed pursuant to Article 3.8 (commencing with Section 14126) of Chapter 7 of Part 3 of Division 9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 508, Sec. 7.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.07.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Costs within the Medi-Cal program continue to grow due to the rising cost of providing health care throughout the state and also due to increases in enrollment, which are more pronounced during difficult economic times.

(2) In order to minimize the need for drastically
 cutting enrollment standards or benefits during times of economic crisis, it is crucial to find areas within the program where reimbursement levels are higher than required under the standard provided in Section 1902(a)(30)(A) of the federal Social Security Act and can be reduced in accordance with federal law.

(3) The Medi-Cal program delivers its services and benefits to Medi-Cal beneficiaries through a wide variety of health care providers, some of which deliver care via managed care or other contract models while others do so through fee-for-service arrangements.

(4) The setting of rates within the Medi-Cal program is complex and is subject to close supervision by the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

(5) As the single state agency for Medicaid in California, the State Department of Health
 Care Services has unique expertise that can inform decisions that set or adjust reimbursement methodologies and levels consistent with the requirements of federal law.

(b) Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature for the department to analyze and identify where reimbursement levels can be reduced consistent with the standard provided in Section 1902(a)(30)(A) of the federal Social Security Act and also consistent with federal and state law and policies, including any exemptions contained in the act that added this section, provided that the reductions in reimbursement shall not exceed 10 percent on an aggregate basis for all providers, services, and products.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and except as provided in paragraphs (2), (3), and (4), for dates of service on and after June 1, 2011, payments to intermediate care facilities
 for the developmentally disabled, licensed pursuant to subdivision (e), (g), or (h) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, and facilities providing continuous skilled nursing care to developmentally disabled individuals pursuant to the pilot project established by Section 14132.20, as determined by the applicable methodology for setting reimbursement rates for these facilities, shall not exceed the reimbursement rates that were applicable to those providers in the 2008–09 rate year, reduced by 10 percent.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director may adjust the percentage reductions specified in paragraph (1), as long as the resulting reductions, in the aggregate, total no more than 10 percent.

(3) The adjustments authorized under this subdivision shall be implemented only if the director determines that the payments resulting from the adjustments comply
 with subdivision (d).

(4) Payments to facilities owned or operated by the state shall be exempt from the payment reduction as required in paragraph (1).

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the payment reductions and adjustments required by subdivision (c) shall be implemented only if the director determines that the payments that result from the application of subdivision (c) will comply with applicable federal Medicaid requirements and that federal financial participation will be available.

(2) In determining whether federal financial participation is available, the director shall determine whether the payments comply with applicable federal Medicaid requirements, including those set forth in Section 1396a(a)(30)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(3) To the extent that the director determines that the payments do not comply with applicable federal Medicaid requirements or that federal financial participation is not available with respect to any payment that is reduced pursuant to this section, the director retains the discretion to not implement the particular payment reduction or adjustment and may adjust the payment as necessary to comply with federal Medicaid requirements.

(4) The director shall seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of this section. This section shall not be implemented until federal approval is obtained. When federal approval is obtained, the payments resulting from the application of subdivision (c) shall be implemented retroactively to June 1, 2011, or on any other date or dates as may be applicable.

(e) For managed
 care health plans that contract with the department pursuant to this chapter and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), except for contracts with the Senior Care Action Network and AIDS Healthcare Foundation, and to the extent that these services are provided through any of those contracts, payments shall be reduced by the actuarial equivalent amount of the reduced provider reimbursements specified in subdivision (c) pursuant to contract amendments or change orders effective on July 1, 2011, or thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 3, Sec. 93.   (AB 97)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.075.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, for dates of service on or after August 1, 2016, payments to intermediate care facilities for the developmentally disabled that are licensed pursuant to subdivision (e), (g), or (h) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, and to facilities providing continuous skilled nursing care to developmentally disabled individuals pursuant to the pilot project established by Section 14132.20, as determined by the applicable methodology for setting reimbursement rates for those facilities, shall be the reimbursement rates that were applicable to those facilities in the 2008–09 rate year, increased by 3.7 percent. Payments to the facilities pursuant to this section shall also include the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates to the extent
 applicable to the reimbursement methodology associated with the type of facility.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) and Sections 14105.191 and 14105.192, and for dates of service on or after August 1, 2021, the reimbursement rates for intermediate care facilities for the developmentally disabled and facilities providing continuous skilled nursing care to developmentally disabled individuals pursuant to Section 14132.20 shall be determined without applying to that rate any reduction, limitation, or increase, including the 3.7-percent increase, specified in paragraph (1), as described in this section or Sections 14105.191 and 14105.192.

(b) (1) For dates of service on or after August 1, 2021, and for each rate year thereafter, the department shall calculate and publish the reimbursement rates, as specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), plus the projected
 cost of complying with new state or federal mandates.

(2) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the reimbursement rates for intermediate care facilities for the developmentally disabled or facilities providing continuous skilled nursing care to developmentally disabled individuals pursuant to Section 14132.20, or both, shall account for, and be inclusive of, supplemental payments, as described under the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016, or Proposition 56, if the Budget Act of that fiscal year appropriates funds from the Healthcare Treatment Fund, as established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30130.55 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, to the department to make those supplemental payments to these facilities.

(3) For dates of service on or after August 1, 2021,
 and for each rate year thereafter, the reimbursement rate established for an intermediate care facility for the developmentally disabled or a facility providing continuous skilled nursing care to developmentally disabled individuals pursuant to Section 14132.20 shall be the greater of that facility’s reimbursement rate established pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2), or the approved Medi-Cal State Plan reimbursement rate, inclusive of the temporary increased Medicaid payments associated with the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency, plus the Proposition 56 supplemental payment amount, in effect for that facility on the last day of the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency.

(4) For dates of service on or after January 1, 2024, the department shall adopt a rate year based on the calendar year for intermediate care facilities for the
 developmentally disabled and facilities providing continuous skilled nursing care to developmentally disabled individuals, pursuant to Section 14132.20.
